dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="दिन्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>थें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छेस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सब__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>भन्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="माग्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हराउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छं__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लग__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="लि__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुपर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सुघ्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="गर्ज__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="मान/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुपर्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दिनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छ्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छेस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सताउँ"><i>सताउँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="माग्"><i>माग्</i><par n="माग्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आउनु"><i>आउनु</i><par n="सब__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सबैभन्"><i>सबैभन्</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हिजो"><i>हिजो</i><par n="सब__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिन्"><i>दिन्</i><par n="दिन्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिँ"><i>लिँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नआउँ"><i>नआउँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लि"><i>लि</i><par n="लि__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लग"><i>लग</i><par n="लग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भन्नु"><i>भन्नु</i><par n="सब__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सकिं"><i>सकिं</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छं"><i>छं</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लगाउं"><i>लगाउं</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लाँ"><i>लाँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुघ्"><i>सुघ्</i><par n="सुघ्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ख्वाउँ"><i>ख्वाउँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="राखिं"><i>राखिं</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सब"><i>सब</i><par n="सब__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पठाउँ"><i>पठाउँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बितिसक्"><i>बितिसक्</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फिर्"><i>फिर्</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रोजिन्"><i>रोजिन्</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भनाउँ"><i>भनाउँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रहं"><i>रहं</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जां"><i>जां</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हराउ"><i>हराउ</i><par n="हराउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फर्कं"><i>फर्कं</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="केलाउँ"><i>केलाउँ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आँउ"><i>आँउ</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मान्"><i>मान</i><par n="मान/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्ज"><i>गर्ज</i><par n="गर्ज__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="नसक्"><i>नसक्</i><par n="छं__vblex"/></e>
